Hawaii statutes.
[§667-65] Application of time share
interest power of sale requirements. The requirements of sections 667-62
to 667-64 shall apply only to time share interest mortgages, loans, agreements,
and contracts that contain the power of sale. [L 2005, c 82, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next